Maryland, session 2026, HB1418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
2–206.1.
(a) A nonpublic school that is subject to the requirements of this title may not hire
or retain any employee who works with or has access to students and who the school knows
HAS BEEN CHARGED WITH OR has been convicted of a crime involving:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1418*

HOUSE BILL 1418
(1) An offense under § 3–307 or § 3–308 of the Criminal Law Article or an
offense under the laws of another state that would constitute a violation of § 3–307 or §
3–308 of the Criminal Law Article if committed in the State;
(2) Child sexual abuse under § 3–602 of the Criminal Law Article, or an
offense under the laws of another state that would constitute child sexual abuse under §
3–602 of the Criminal Law Article if committed in this State; [or]
(3) A crime of violence as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal Law Article,
or an offense under the laws of another state that would be a violation of § 14–101 of the
Criminal Law Article if committed in this State;
(4) A CRIME OF MORAL TURPITUDE, OR AN OFFENSE UNDER THE
LAWS OF ANOTHER STATE THAT WOULD CONSTITUTE A CRIME OF MORAL
TURPITUDE IF COMMITTED IN THIS STATE;
(5) A DISTRIBUTION CRIME UNDER THE MARYLAND CONTROLLED
DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES ACT, OR AN OFFENSE UNDER THE LAWS OF ANOTHER
STATE THAT WOULD CONSTITUTE A DISTRIBUTION CRIME IN THIS STATE UNDER
THE MARYLAND CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES ACT;
(6) A FEDERAL CRIME INVOLVING THE TARGETING OF A SCHOOL,
INCLUDING SCHOOL STUDENTS, PERSONNEL, PROPERTY, OR OPERATIONS; OR
(7) ANY FELONY NOT COVERED UNDER ITEMS (1) THROUGH (6) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, OR AN OFFENSE UNDER THE LAWS OF ANOTHER STATE OR THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT THAT WOULD CONSTITUTE A FELONY IN THIS STATE.
(b) A nonpublic school contract shall provide that a contractor or subcontractor
for the school may not knowingly assign an employee to work on school premises with
direct, unsupervised, and uncontrolled access to children, if the employee HAS BEEN
CHARGED WITH OR has been convicted of a crime identified under subsection (a) of this
section.
(c) The State Board:
(1) Shall revoke the certificate of approval or letter of tentative approval of
a nonpublic school that violates subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) May revoke the certificate of approval or letter of tentative approval of
a nonpublic school that violates subsection (b) of this section.
(D) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THIS SECTION DOES
NOT PRECLUDE A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL FROM HIRING OR REHIRING, OR A

HOUSE BILL 1418 3
CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR FROM ASSIGNING TO A SCHOOL, AN INDIVIDUAL
WHOSE CHARGE DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IS DISPOSED
OF BY AN ACQUITTAL, A DISMISSAL, OR A NOLLE PROSEQUI.
(E) (1) AN EMPLOYEE OF A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL WHO IS CHARGED WITH
A CRIME DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL NOTIFY THE
SCHOOL WITHIN 2 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE INDIVIDUAL HAS NOTICE OF THE
CHARGE.
(2) AN EMPLOYEE WHO FAILS TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE REHIRED BY THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL FOR 5 YEARS,
BEGINNING WITH THE DATE THE CHARGE IS DISPOSED OF BY AN ACQUITTAL, A
DISMISSAL, OR A NOLLE PROSEQUI.
6–113.
(a) A county board may not knowingly hire or retain any individual who HAS
BEEN CHARGED WITH OR has been convicted of a crime involving:
(1) An offense under § 3–307 or § 3–308 of the Criminal Law Article or an
offense under the laws of another state that would constitute a violation of § 3–307 or §
3–308 of the Criminal Law Article if committed in the State;
(2) Child sexual abuse under § 3–602 of the Criminal Law Article, or an
offense under the laws of another state that would constitute child sexual abuse under §
3–602 of the Criminal Law Article if committed in this State; [or]
(3) A crime of violence as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal Law Article,
or an offense under the laws of another state that would be a violation of § 14–101 of the
Criminal Law Article if committed in this State;
(4) A CRIME OF MORAL TURPITUDE, OR AN OFFENSE UNDER THE
LAWS OF ANOTHER STATE THAT WOULD CONSTITUTE A CRIME OF MORAL
TURPITUDE IF COMMITTED IN THIS STATE;
(5) A DISTRIBUTION CRIME UNDER THE MARYLAND CONTROLLED
DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES ACT, OR AN OFFENSE UNDER THE LAWS OF ANOTHER
STATE THAT WOULD CONSTITUTE A DISTRIBUTION CRIME IN THIS STATE UNDER
THE MARYLAND CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES ACT;
(6) A FEDERAL CRIME INVOLVING THE TARGETING OF A SCHOOL,
INCLUDING SCHOOL STUDENTS, PERSONNEL, PROPERTY, OR OPERATIONS; OR

HOUSE BILL 1418
(7) ANY FELONY NOT COVERED UNDER ITEMS (1) THROUGH (6) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, OR AN OFFENSE UNDER THE LAWS OF ANOTHER STATE OR THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT THAT WOULD CONSTITUTE A FELONY IN THIS STATE.
(b) A local school system contract shall provide that a contractor or subcontractor
for the local school system may not knowingly assign an employee to work on school
premises with direct, unsupervised, and uncontrolled access to children, if the employee
HAS BEEN CHARGED WITH OR has been convicted of a crime identified under subsection
(a) of this section.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THIS SECTION DOES
NOT PRECLUDE A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM FROM HIRING OR REHIRING, OR A
CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR FROM ASSIGNING TO A SCHOOL, AN INDIVIDUAL
WHOSE CHARGE DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IS DISPOSED
OF BY AN ACQUITTAL, A DISMISSAL, OR A NOLLE PROSEQUI.
(D) (1) AN EMPLOYEE OF A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM WHO IS CHARGED
WITH A CRIME DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL NOTIFY
THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM WITHIN 2 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE EMPLOYEE HAS
NOTICE OF THE CHARGE.
(2) AN EMPLOYEE WHO FAILS TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE REHIRED BY THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM FOR 5
YEARS, BEGINNING WITH THE DATE THE CHARGE IS DISPOSED OF BY AN ACQUITTAL,
A DISMISSAL, OR A NOLLE PROSEQUI.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.